Hawaii statutes.
[§414-473] Penalties imposed upon
corporations. Each corporation, domestic or foreign, that fails or refuses
to file its annual report for any year within the time prescribed by this part
shall be subject to a forfeiture of an amount to be determined by the
department director not exceeding $100 for every violation, neglect, or
failure, to be recovered by action brought in the name of the State by the
department director. A continuance of a failure to file the required report
shall be a separate offense for each thirty days of the continuance. The
department director, for good cause shown, may reduce or waive the penalty
imposed by this section. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next